dev/mt_wiktionary/nounNoNumber.all.fat.dix
  <!-- lejla; lejla; 1 -->
    <pardef n="lejla__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- muntanja; muntanja; 1 -->
    <pardef n="muntanja__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- muntanja; muntanja; 1 -->
    <pardef n="muntanja__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ċomb; ċomb; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ċomb__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ċomb; ċomb; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ċomb__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- karakka; karakka; 1 -->
    <pardef n="karakka__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- karakka; karakka; 1 -->
    <pardef n="karakka__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- pożati; pożati; 1 -->
    <pardef n="pożati__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- żebbuġ; żebbuġ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="żebbuġ__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- manifestazzjoni; manifestazzjoni; 1 -->
    <pardef n="manifestazzjoni__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- Tedesk; Tedesk; 1 -->
    <pardef n="Tedesk__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- Tedesk; Tedesk; 1 -->
    <pardef n="Tedesk__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- sigarri; sigarri; 1 -->
    <pardef n="sigarri__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- abitat; abitat; 1 -->
    <pardef n="abitat__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- Finlandiż; Finlandiż; 1 -->
    <pardef n="Finlandiż__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- Finlandiż; Finlandiż; 1 -->
    <pardef n="Finlandiż__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- rektum; rektum; 1 -->
    <pardef n="rektum__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ħarifa; ħarifa; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ħarifa__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ħarifa; ħarifa; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ħarifa__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- reliġjon; reliġjon; 1 -->
    <pardef n="reliġjon__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- għadma; għadma; 1 -->
    <pardef n="għadma__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- Ġermaniża; Ġermaniża; 1 -->
    <pardef n="Ġermaniża__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- Ġermaniża; Ġermaniża; 1 -->
    <pardef n="Ġermaniża__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- wiżża; wiżża; 1 -->
    <pardef n="wiżża__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ingliż; ingliż; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ingliż__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ingliż; ingliż; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ingliż__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- interazzjoni_elettromanjetika; interazzjoni_elettromanjetika; 1 -->
    <pardef n="interazzjoni_elettromanjetika__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- kontribuzzjoni; kontribuzzjoni; 1 -->
    <pardef n="kontribuzzjoni__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- raħal; raħal; 1 -->
    <pardef n="raħal__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- raħal; raħal; 1 -->
    <pardef n="raħal__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ġebla; ġebla; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ġebla__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- serduq; serduq; 1 -->
    <pardef n="serduq__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- serduq; serduq; 1 -->
    <pardef n="serduq__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- nagħġa; nagħġa; 1 -->
    <pardef n="nagħġa__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- storja; storja; 1 -->
    <pardef n="storja__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- Ġermaniż; Ġermaniż; 1 -->
    <pardef n="Ġermaniż__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- Ġermaniż; Ġermaniż; 1 -->
    <pardef n="Ġermaniż__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- furnara; furnara; 1 -->
    <pardef n="furnara__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- furnara; furnara; 1 -->
    <pardef n="furnara__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- wiċċ; wiċċ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="wiċċ__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- kaboċċa; kaboċċa; 1 -->
    <pardef n="kaboċċa__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="lejla"><i>lejla</i><par n="lejla__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="muntanja"><i>muntanja</i><par n="muntanja__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="muntanja"><i>muntanja</i><par n="muntanja__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ċomb"><i>ċomb</i><par n="ċomb__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ċomb"><i>ċomb</i><par n="ċomb__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="karakka"><i>karakka</i><par n="karakka__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="karakka"><i>karakka</i><par n="karakka__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="pożati"><i>pożati</i><par n="pożati__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="żebbuġ"><i>żebbuġ</i><par n="żebbuġ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="manifestazzjoni"><i>manifestazzjoni</i><par n="manifestazzjoni__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="Tedesk"><i>Tedesk</i><par n="Tedesk__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="Tedesk"><i>Tedesk</i><par n="Tedesk__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="sigarri"><i>sigarri</i><par n="sigarri__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="abitat"><i>abitat</i><par n="abitat__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Finlandiż"><i>Finlandiż</i><par n="Finlandiż__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="Finlandiż"><i>Finlandiż</i><par n="Finlandiż__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="rektum"><i>rektum</i><par n="rektum__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ħarifa"><i>ħarifa</i><par n="ħarifa__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ħarifa"><i>ħarifa</i><par n="ħarifa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="reliġjon"><i>reliġjon</i><par n="reliġjon__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="għadma"><i>għadma</i><par n="għadma__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Ġermaniża"><i>Ġermaniża</i><par n="Ġermaniża__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Ġermaniża"><i>Ġermaniża</i><par n="Ġermaniża__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="wiżża"><i>wiżża</i><par n="wiżża__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ingliż"><i>ingliż</i><par n="ingliż__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ingliż"><i>ingliż</i><par n="ingliż__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="interazzjoni_elettromanjetika"><i>interazzjoni_elettromanjetika</i><par n="interazzjoni_elettromanjetika__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="kontribuzzjoni"><i>kontribuzzjoni</i><par n="kontribuzzjoni__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="raħal"><i>raħal</i><par n="raħal__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="raħal"><i>raħal</i><par n="raħal__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ġebla"><i>ġebla</i><par n="ġebla__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="serduq"><i>serduq</i><par n="serduq__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="serduq"><i>serduq</i><par n="serduq__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="nagħġa"><i>nagħġa</i><par n="nagħġa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="storja"><i>storja</i><par n="storja__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Ġermaniż"><i>Ġermaniż</i><par n="Ġermaniż__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="Ġermaniż"><i>Ġermaniż</i><par n="Ġermaniż__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="furnara"><i>furnara</i><par n="furnara__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="furnara"><i>furnara</i><par n="furnara__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="wiċċ"><i>wiċċ</i><par n="wiċċ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="kaboċċa"><i>kaboċċa</i><par n="kaboċċa__n_f"/></e>
